lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/c.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl %> v́

LEXICON Root

nouns ;

LEXICON nouns
järv́ m ;
boat m ;
fish m ;
cat m ;
spy m ;
boy m ;
ox OX ;

LEXICON m
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>s # ;

LEXICON OX
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>en # ;
